Missouri, session 2026, SB1723.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 313.820 and 313.822, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 313.820 and 313.822, to read as follows:
313.820. 1. (1) An excursion boat licensee shall pay
to the commission an admission fee of [two] five dollars for
each person embarking on an excursion gambling boat with a
ticket of admission. One dollar of such fee shall be
deposited to the credit of the gaming commission fund as
authorized pursuant to section 313.835, and [one dollar]
four dollars of such fee shall not be considered state funds
and shall be paid [to the home dock city or county] as
follows:
(a) One dollar of such fee shall be paid to the home
dock city or county;
(b) One dollar of such fee shall be remitted to the
Missouri department of mental health developmental
disabilities division for payments solely for providing
community services, ongoing learning, education, and support
to people with developmental disabilities, including, but
not limited to, the purchase of services from providers
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1723 2
designated by the division of developmental disabilities,
but not for the support of the facilities operated by the
department of mental health; and
(c) Two dollars of such fee shall be paid to the
veterans commission capital improvement trust fund.
(2) Subject to appropriation, one cent of such fee
deposited to the credit of the gaming commission fund may be
deposited to the credit of the compulsive gamblers fund
created pursuant to the provisions of section 313.842.
Nothing in this section shall preclude any licensee from
charging any amount deemed necessary for a ticket of
admission to any person embarking on an excursion gambling
boat. If tickets are issued which are good for more than
one excursion, the admission fee shall be paid to the
commission for each person using the ticket on each
excursion that the ticket is used. If free passes or
complimentary admission tickets are issued, the excursion
boat licensee shall pay to the commission the same fee upon
these passes or complimentary tickets as if they were sold
at the regular and usual admission rate; however, the
excursion boat licensee may issue fee-free passes to actual
and necessary officials and employees of the licensee or
other persons actually working on the excursion gambling
boat. The issuance of fee-free passes is subject to the
rules of the commission, and a list of all persons to whom
the fee-free passes are issued shall be filed with the
commission.
2. All licensees are subject to all income taxes,
sales taxes, earnings taxes, use taxes, property taxes or
any other tax or fee now or hereafter lawfully levied by any
political subdivision; however, no other license tax, permit
tax, occupation tax, excursion fee, or taxes or fees shall

SB 1723 3
be imposed, levied or assessed exclusively upon licensees by
a political subdivision. All state taxes not connected
directly to gambling games shall be collected by the
department of revenue. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 32.057 to the contrary, the department of revenue
may furnish and the commission may receive tax information
to determine if applicants or licensees are complying with
the tax laws of this state; however, any tax information
acquired by the commission shall not become public record
and shall be used exclusively for commission business.
313.822. A tax is imposed on the adjusted gross
receipts received from gambling games authorized pursuant to
sections 313.800 to 313.850 at the rate of [twenty-one]
thirty-four percent. The taxes imposed by this section
shall be returned to the commission in accordance with the
commission's rules and regulations who shall transfer such
taxes to the director of revenue. All checks and drafts
remitted for payment of these taxes and fees shall be made
payable to the director of revenue. If the commission is
not satisfied with the return or payment made by any
licensee, it is hereby authorized and empowered to make an
assessment of the amount due based upon any information
within its possession or that shall come into its
possession. Any licensee against whom an assessment is made
by the commission may petition for a reassessment. The
request for reassessment shall be made within twenty days
from the date the assessment was mailed or delivered to the
licensee, whichever is earlier. Whereupon the commission
shall give notice of a hearing for reassessment and fix the
date upon which the hearing shall be held. The assessment
shall become final if a request for reassessment is not
received by the commission within the twenty days. Except

SB 1723 4
as provided in this section, on and after April 29, 1993,
all functions incident to the administration, collection,
enforcement, and operation of the tax imposed by sections
144.010 to 144.525 shall be applicable to the taxes and fees
imposed by this section.
(1) Each excursion gambling boat shall designate a
city or county as its home dock. The home dock city or
county may enter into agreements with an excursion gambling
boat and other cities or counties authorized pursuant to
subsection 10 of section 313.812 to share revenue obtained
[pursuant to this section] from the excursion gambling
boats' portion of adjusted gross receipts. The home dock
city or county shall receive ten percent of the first twenty-
one percent of the adjusted gross receipts tax collections,
as levied pursuant to this section, for use in providing
services necessary for the safety of the public visiting an
excursion gambling boat. Such home dock city or county
shall annually submit to the commission a shared revenue
agreement with any excursion gambling boat and any other
city or county. All moneys owed the home dock city or
county shall be deposited and distributed to such city or
county in accordance with rules and regulations of the
commission. All revenues provided for in this section to be
transferred to the governing body of any city not within a
county and any city with a population of over three hundred
fifty thousand inhabitants shall not be considered state
funds and shall be deposited in such city's general revenue
fund to be expended as provided for in this section.
(2) The remaining amount of the adjusted gross
receipts tax shall be deposited in the state treasury to the
credit of the "Gaming Proceeds for Education Fund" which is
hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys deposited in

SB 1723 5
this fund shall be kept separate from the general revenue
fund as well as any other funds or accounts in the state
treasury, shall be used solely for education pursuant to the
Missouri Constitution and shall be considered the proceeds
of excursion boat gambling and state funds pursuant to
Article IV, Section 15 of the Missouri Constitution. All
interest received on the gaming proceeds for education fund
shall be credited to the gaming proceeds for education
fund. Appropriation of the moneys deposited into the gaming
proceeds for education fund shall be pursuant to state law.
(3) The state auditor shall perform an annual audit of
the gaming proceeds for education fund, which shall include
the evaluation of whether appropriations for elementary and
secondary education have increased and are being used as
intended. The state auditor shall make copies of each audit
available to the public and to the general assembly.
✓